Hawaii statutes.
[§445-95.1] Unfair or deceptive practices
prohibited. (a) No person shall engage in this State in any act or
practice which is prohibited in section 445-95.2 or which is defined in that
section as, or determined under that section to be, an unfair or deceptive act
or practice in the rooming house business.

(b) Any facility owned or used by a government
agency or by a nonprofit agency which is registered with the department of
commerce and consumer affairs and providing services by contract for a government
agency, shall be exempt from this section.

(c) The department of human services shall
enforce the provisions of this section and shall refer to other state and
county agencies any violations enforced by those other governmental agencies.
[L 1988, c 313, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next